New York, session 2025-2026, S573.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (a) of paragraph 27 of subdivision (a) of 2 section 1642 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by section 2 of 3 part OO of chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (a) Establishment of maximum speed limits below twenty miles per hour 6 at which motor vehicles may proceed on or along designated highways 7 within such city for the explicit purpose of implementing traffic calm- 8 ing measures as such term is defined herein or for the explicit purpose 9 of implementing an open street; provided, however, that no speed limit 10 shall be set below ten miles per hour nor shall such speed limit be 11 established where the traffic calming measure to be implemented consists 12 solely of a traffic control sign, and provided, further, that no speed 13 limit shall be set below five miles per hour on an open street. Estab- 14 lishment of such a speed limit shall, where applicable, be in compliance 15 with the provisions of sections sixteen hundred twenty-four and sixteen 16 hundred eighty-four of this title. Nothing contained herein shall be 17 deemed to alter or affect the establishment of school speed limits 18 pursuant to the provisions of section sixteen hundred forty-three of 19 this article. For the purposes of this paragraph, "traffic calming meas- 20 ures" shall mean any physical engineering measure or measures that 21 reduce the negative effects of motor vehicle use, alter driver behavior 22 and improve conditions for non-motorized street users such as pedestri- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00603-01-5 S. 573 2 1 ans and bicyclists, and "open street" shall mean a street or segment of 2 a street designated by the New York city department of transportation as 3 such pursuant to section 19-107.1 of the administrative code of the city 4 of New York, on which motor vehicle access is controlled by barriers and 5 signage or other traffic calming measures, and on which priority is 6 given to pedestrians, individuals using bicycles, and other non-vehicu- 7 lar street users. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date.